Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB6.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$150,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the endowed research fund established in KRS
164.038. The funding shall be evenly distributed across the five consortium accounts
created in KRS 164.038(1)(g). In accordance with KRS 164.038(1)(e), moneys in the
endowed research fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
Section 2. Whereas fostering research excellence, attracting renowned faculty,
and improving economic opportunities is important for the citizens of the
Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
BR176200.100 - 1762 - XXXX 3/10/2026 3:10 PM Jacketed